New York, session 2025-2026, A895.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Item (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph 10 of subsection 2 (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law, as added by chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 1996, is amended to read as follows: 4 (ii) Maternity care coverage shall also include, at minimum, parent 5 education, assistance and training in breast or bottle feeding, [and] 6 the performance of any necessary maternal and newborn clinical assess- 7 ments, and an initial appropriate child restraint system as defined in 8 subdivision four of section twelve hundred twenty-nine-c of the vehicle 9 and traffic law. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02098-02-5